Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3903
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of
the Legislature that the Indoor Tanning Facility Act be implemented and enforced
in a manner that ensures equal treatment of all tanning facilities regardless
of the type of business or facility or number of pieces of tanning equipment
at the tanning facility.

Laws 2014, LB132, § 3.